District of Columbia statutes.
47-2321

Rules and regulations by Mayor.

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of § 47-2005 or this subchapter or both, in order to properly administer the provisions of § 47-2005 or this subchapter, or both.

History

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-128, § 13, 28 DCR 246
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2321.